zh-TW: 包含的系統組件: AV 接收器; 中置揚聲器; 前置揚聲器; 麥克風; 安裝硬體; 遠端控制; 條形音箱; 揚聲器線材; 重低音; 環繞揚聲器; 其他
sk-SK: Komponenty systému v balení: AV prijímač; Centrálny reproduktor; Predné reproduktory; Mikrofón; Montážny hardvér; Diaľkové ovládanie; Zvuková lišta; Reproduktorové káble; Subwoofer; Priestorové reproduktory; Iné
de: Enthaltene Systemkomponenten: AV-Receiver; Centerlautsprecher; Frontlautsprecher; Mikrofon; Montagezubehör; Fernsteuerung; Soundbar; Lautsprecherkabel; Subwoofer; Surround-Lautsprecher; Sonstiges
it: Componenti del sistema inclusi: Ricevitore AV; Altoparlante centrale; Altoparlanti frontali; Microfono; Hardware da montare; Telecomando; Soundbar; Cavi degli altoparlanti; Subwoofer; Altoparlanti surround; Altro
ko: 시스템 포함 구성품: AV 리시버; 센터 스피커; 프론트 스피커; 마이크; 장착 하드웨어; 원격 제어; 사운드바; 스피커 선; 서브우퍼; 서라운드 스피커; 기타
zh-CN: 系统包含的组件: AV 接收器; 中置扬声器; 前置扬声器; 麦克风; 安装五金件; 远程控制; 条形音箱; 扬声器线; 低音炮; 环绕扬声器; 其他
ro-RO: Componente de sistem incluse: Receiver AV; Difuzor central; Difuzoare frontale; Microfon; Feronerie pentru montare; Telecomandă; Bară de sunet; Cabluri pentru difuzoare; Subwoofer; Difuzoare surround; Altele
el: Εξαρτήματα συστήματος που περιλαμβάνονται: Δέκτης AV; Κεντρικό ηχείο; Μπροστινά ηχεία; Μικρόφωνο; Υλικό τοποθέτησης; Τηλεχειρισμός; Soundbar; Καλώδια ηχείων; Subwoofer; Ηχεία surround; Άλλο
en: System components included: AV receiver; Center speaker; Front speakers; Microphone; Mounting hardware; Remote control; Soundbar; Speaker wires; Subwoofer; Surround speakers; Other
hu: Rendszerkomponensek mellékelve: AV vevő; Középső hangsugárzó; Első hangsugárzók; Mikrofon; Rögzítőelemek; Távvezérlés; Hangsáv; Hangszóró kábelek; Mélynyomó; Térhatású hangsugárzók; Egyéb
es: Componentes del sistema incluidos: Receptor AV; Altavoz central; Altavoces frontales; Micrófono; Accesorios de montaje; Control remoto; Barra de sonido; Cables de altavoz; Subwoofer; Altavoces envolventes; Otros
da: Systemkomponenter inkluderet: AV-modtager; Centerhøjttaler; Fronthøjttalere; Mikrofon; Monteringshardware; Fjernbetjening; Soundbar; Højttalerkabler; Subwoofer; Surroundhøjttalere; Andet
nl: Systeemcomponenten inbegrepen: AV-ontvanger; Centerluidspreker; Frontluidsprekers; Microfoon; Bevestigingsmateriaal; Afstandsbediening; Soundbar; Luidsprekerkabels; Subwoofer; Surround-luidsprekers; Andere
hr-HR: Uključene komponente sustava: AV prijemnik; Centralni zvučnik; Prednji zvučnici; Mikrofon; Montažna oprema; Upravljanje na daljinu; Soundbar; Zvučnički kabeli; Subwoofer; Surround zvučnici; Ostalo
pt-BR: Componentes do sistema incluídos: Receiver AV; Alto-falante central; Alto-falantes frontais; Microfone; Hardware de montagem; Controle remoto; Barra de som; Cabos de alto-falante; Subwoofer; Alto-falantes surround; Outro
vi: Thành phần hệ thống được bao gồm: Bộ thu AV; Loa trung tâm; Loa trước; Micrô; Phần cứng lắp ghép; Điều khiển từ xa; Loa thanh; Dây loa; Loa siêu trầm; Loa vòm; Khác
lt-LT: Įtraukti sistemos komponentai: AV imtuvas; Centrinis garsiakalbis; Priekiniai garsiakalbiai; Mikrofonas; Tvirtinimo įranga; Nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Garso sistema; Garsiakalbių laidai; Žemadažnis garsiakalbis; Erdvinio garso garsiakalbiai; Kita
sl-SI: Vključene sistemske komponente: AV sprejemnik; Sredinski zvočnik; Sprednji zvočniki; Mikrofon; Montažna oprema; Daljinsko upravljanje; Zvočna palica; Zvočniške žice; Globokotonec; Prostorski zvočniki; Drugo
th: ส่วนประกอบระบบที่รวมอยู่: AV รีซีฟเวอร์; ลำโพงกลาง; ลำโพงหน้า; ไมโครโฟน; ฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับติดตั้ง; รีโมตควบคุม; ซาวด์บาร์; สายลำโพง; ซับวูฟเฟอร์; ลำโพงเซอร์ราวด์; อื่นๆ
cs: Součásti systému v balení: AV přijímač; Středový reproduktor; Přední reproduktory; Mikrofon; Montážní hardware; Dálkové ovládání; Soundbar; Reproduktorové kabely; Subwoofer; Prostorové reproduktory; Jiné
pt-PT: Componentes do sistema incluídos: Recetor AV; Coluna central; Colunas frontais; Microfone; Hardware de montagem; Controlo remoto; Barra de som; Cabos de coluna; Subwoofer; Colunas surround; Outro
ru: Компоненты системы в комплекте: AV-ресивер; Центральная колонка; Фронтальные колонки; Микрофон; Крепежные приспособления; Пульт дистанционного управления; Звуковая панель; Провода для колонок; Сабвуфер; Колонки объемного звучания; Другой
fi: Sisältyvät järjestelmäkomponentit: AV-viritinvahvistin; Keskikaiutin; Etukaiuttimet; Mikrofoni; Asennuslaitteisto; Kauko-ohjain; Soundbar; Kaiutinjohdot; Subwoofer; Tilaäänikaiuttimet; Muu
sv: Ingående systemkomponenter: AV-mottagare; Centerhögtalare; Fronthögtalare; Mikrofon; Monteringsutrustning; Fjärrkontroll; Soundbar; Högtalarkablar; Subwoofer; Surroundhögtalare; Övrigt
fr: Composants du système inclus: Récepteur AV; Haut-parleur central; Haut-parleurs avant; Microphone; Matériau du montage; Télécommande; Barre de son; Câbles de haut-parleurs; Caisson de basses; Haut-parleurs surround; Autre
nb: Systemkomponenter inkludert: AV-mottaker; Senterhøyttaler; Fronthøyttalere; Mikrofon; Monteringsmaskinvare; Fjernkontroll; Lydplanke; Høyttalerkabler; Subwoofer; Surroundhøyttalere; Annet
ja: システム付属コンポーネント: AV レシーバー; センタースピーカー; フロントスピーカー; マイク; 取り付け金具; リモコン; サウンドバー; スピーカーケーブル; サブウーファー; サラウンドスピーカー; その他
bg-BG: Включени системни компоненти: AV приемник; Централен високоговорител; Предни високоговорители; Микрофон; Монтажен хардуер; Дистанционно управление; Саундбар; Кабели за високоговорители; Субуфер; Съраунд високоговорители; Други
pl: Komponenty systemu w zestawie: Amplituner AV; Głośnik centralny; Głośniki przednie; Mikrofon; Sprzęt montażowy; Zdalne sterowanie; Listwa głośnikowa; Przewody głośnikowe; Subwoofer; Głośniki przestrzenne; Inne
tr: Sistem dahil bileşenler: AV alıcısı; Merkez hoparlör; Ön hoparlörler; Mikrofon; Montaj donanımı; Uzaktan kumanda; Ses çubuğu; Hoparlör kabloları; Derin bas hoparlör; Surround hoparlörler; Diğer